Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.045

Rollover or investment change of 529 accounts to state-sponsored plans or eligible 529 plans—Report.

(1) The committee shall create an expedited process by which owners can complete a direct rollover or investment change of a 529 account from a:

(a) State-sponsored prepaid tuition plan to a state-sponsored college savings plan;

(b) State-sponsored college savings plan to a state-sponsored prepaid tuition plan; or

(c) State-sponsored prepaid tuition plan or a state-sponsored college savings plan to an out-of-state eligible 529 plan.

(2) The committee shall report annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on (a) the number of accounts that have been rolled into the Washington college savings program from out of state and (b) the number of accounts rolled out of the Washington college savings program to 529 plans into other states.

[ 2018 c 188 s 3; 2016 c 69 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 188: See note following RCW 28B.95.030.